New York, session 2025-2026, S4398.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 29 of the correction law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. a. On or before the thirty-first day of March, two thousand twen- 4 ty-six, and every year thereafter, the commissioner shall provide an 5 annual report to the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of 6 the assembly, the minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of 7 the assembly and the chairs of the senate crime victims, crime and 8 correction and assembly correction committees on incarcerated individual 9 mortality investigations conducted by the department. Such report shall 10 include, but not be limited to: factors such as cause of death and 11 circumstances surrounding death, age of incarcerated individual, 12 sentence and time served, gender, race and ethnicity of incarcerated 13 individual, commitment offense, facility and time served in facility in 14 which death occurred, location of death within the facility or outside 15 hospital and a statement as to whether or not such incarcerated individ- 16 ual was in receipt of specialized care or treatment or in disciplinary 17 confinement, whether such incarcerated individual was retrieved by next 18 of kin or buried on prison grounds, and any other such data as the 19 department shall deem relevant. Such report shall include an analysis of 20 any apparent trends and comparison to historic statistical data relating 21 to incarcerated individual mortality. 22 b. For all deaths that result from suicide or other categories of 23 incarcerated individual death, a detailed preliminary report shall be 24 provided to the recipients of the annual report listed in this section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05816-01-5 S. 4398 2 1 within seven days that specifies the name of the incarcerated individual 2 and the circumstances of their death, the status of the investigation 3 into such death, and whether any other incarcerated individuals, staff 4 or officers involved in the circumstances that resulted in the death of 5 the incarcerated individual were injured, seriously injured or severely 6 injured requiring outside hospitalization, or if any other such person 7 has been suspended, detained or referred for prosecution. Upon 8 completion of its investigation the department shall issue a final 9 report to such recipients. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law.